Massachusetts, session 194th, H2909.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 94B the 
following section:- 
Section 94C. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Post-traumatic stress disorder”, a disorder that meets the diagnostic criteria for post-
traumatic stress, specified by the American Psychiatric Association in the fifth edition of the 
Diagnostic and Statistics Manual of Mental Disorders, or most recently published edition. 
“Mental health professional”, a person with professional training, experience and 
demonstrated competence in the treatment and diagnosis of mental conditions, who is certified or 

of 3 10 licensed to provide mental health care services and for whom diagnosis of mental conditions are 
within their scope of practice, including a physician, nurse with recognized psychiatric 
specialties, psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, mental health counselor or alcohol 
and drug abuse counselor. 
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary relative to the non-
contributory or contributory retirement system, any condition of impairment of health caused by 
post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosed by a mental health professional resulting in total or 
partial disability or death of: (1) a full-time uniformed member of a paid police department, paid 
fire department, paid municipal emergency medical service department, the police department of 
the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the state police or the public works building 
police, (2) any employee in the department of correction or a county correctional facility whose 
regular or incidental duties require the care, supervision or custody of prisoners, criminally 
insane persons or defective delinquents, (3) any permanent crash crewmen, crash boatman, fire 
controlman or assistant fire controlman employed at the General Edward Lawrence Logan 
International Airport, (4) the members of the 104th fighter wing fire department or (5) members 
of the Massachusetts military reservation fire department, shall if they successfully passed a 
physical examination on entry into said service, which examination failed to reveal any evidence 
of said condition, shall be presumed to have been suffered in the line of duty, unless it is shown 
by a preponderance of the evidence that the post-traumatic stress was caused by non-service 
connected risk factors or non-service connected exposure. 
(c) Any person first diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder within 5 years of the 
last date on which said person actively served shall be eligible to apply for benefits pursuant to 

of 3 32 this section, and if granted, said benefits shall be payable as of the date on which the employee 
last received regular compensation. 
(d) Post-traumatic stress disorder shall not be presumed to have been suffered in the line 
of duty of it results from any disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff, demotion, 
termination, resignation, retirement or similar bona fide personnel action taken in good faith by 
the employer.